North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 6. Disability Income Plan of North Carolina.

§ 135-100.
Short title and purpose.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “Disability Income Plan of North Carolina”.

The purpose of this Article is to provide equitable replacement income for eligible teachers and employees who become temporarily or permanently disabled for the performance of their duty prior to retirement, and to encourage disabled teachers and employees
who are able to work to seek gainful employment after a reasonable period of rehabilitation, and to provide for the accrual of retirement and ancillary benefits to the date the eligible teacher or employee meets the requirements
for retirement under the provisions of this Chapter.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q).

Study Commission on State Disability Income Plan, Death Benefit Plan, and Separate Insurance Benefits Plan for Law Enforcement Officers.

Session Laws 2003-284, ss. 30.20(a) through (i), as amended by Session Laws 2004-78, s. 5, provides: “(a) There is established a Study Commission on the State Disability Income Plan, the State Death Benefit Plan, and the Separate Insurance Benefits Plan
for Law Enforcement Officers.

“(b) The Commission shall be comprised of 13 members as follows:

“(1) Four persons appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to State employees, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to school employees, and one of whom
shall be familiar with workers’ compensation issues relating to State employees or school employees.

“(2) Four persons appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to State employees, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to school employees, and one of
whom shall be familiar with workers’ compensation issues relating to State employees or school employees.

“(3) The State Treasurer, or the Treasurer’s designee.

“(4) The Executive Administrator of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Comprehensive Major Medical Plan.

“(5) The Chair of the North Carolina Industrial Commission, or the Chair’s designee.

“(6) One person appointed by the President of The University of North Carolina who is familiar with disability issues relating to university employees.

“(7) One person appointed by the President of the North Carolina Community Colleges System who is familiar with disability issues relating to community college employees.

“Any vacancy shall be filled by the officer who made the original appointment.

“(c) The Commission shall study the plan design, funding, and administration of the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina established pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Death Benefit Plan established pursuant to

G.S. 135-5

( l ), and the Separate Insurance Benefits Plan for State and Local Governmental Law Enforcement Officers established pursuant to

G.S. 143-166.60

to determine what changes, if any, should be made to those Plans. The Commission shall consider what changes could be made to the Plans that would enhance the efficiency of and reduce the cost of the Plans to the State
and its employees.

“(d) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate cochairs of the Commission from among their respective appointees. The Commission shall meet upon the call of the cochairs. Members of the Commission
shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel allowance in accordance with

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate. The Commission, while in the discharge of official duties, may exercise all powers provided for under the provisions of

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19.1

through

G.S. 120-19

.4. The Commission shall terminate the earlier of the delivery of its final report or December 31, 2004.

“(e) The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Commission in its work. The House of Representatives’ and the Senate’s Directors of Legislative Assistants shall assign clerical
staff to the Commission, and the expenses relating to the clerical employees shall be borne by the Commission. Subject to the approval of the Legislative Services Commission, the Commission may meet in the Legislative Building or the
Legislative Office Building.

“(f) The Commission shall employ an actuary with expertise in the areas of disability income insurance and group life insurance to assist the Commission in its work pursuant to the procedure set forth in

G.S. 120-32.02

. This actuary shall not be a State employee or a person currently under contract with the State to provide services. If necessary, the Commission may hire other employees as provided in

G.S. 120-32.02

.

“(g) The Commission may meet during a regular or extra session of the General Assembly, subject to approval of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(h) The Commission shall submit a report of the results of its study, including any legislative recommendations, to the General Assembly not later than January 1, 2005.

“(i) Of the funds appropriated to the General Assembly, the Legislative Services Commission shall allocate funds to implement the provisions of subsections (a) through (i) of this section.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.1, provides: “There is established a Study Commission on the State Disability Income Plan and Other Related Plans.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.2, provides: “The Commission shall be comprised of 13 members as follows:

“(1) Four persons appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to State employees, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to school employees, one of whom shall
be familiar with workers’ compensation issues relating to State employees or school employees, and one at-large.

“(2) Four persons appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to State employees, one of whom shall be familiar with disability issues relating to school employees, one of whom
shall be familiar with workers’ compensation issues relating to State employees or school employees, and one at-large.

“(3) The State Treasurer or the Treasurer’s designee.

“(4) The Executive Administrator of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Comprehensive Major Medical Plan.

“(5) The Chair of the North Carolina Industrial Commission or the Chair’s designee.

“(6) One person appointed by the President of The University of North Carolina who is familiar with disability issues relating to university employees.

“(7) One person appointed by the President of the North Carolina Community Colleges System who is familiar with disability issues relating to community college employees.

“Any vacancy shall be filled by the officer who made the original appointment. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall each appoint a co-chair. The Commission shall meet at the call of the co-chairs.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.3, provides: “The Commission shall study the plan design, funding, and administration of the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina established pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Death Benefit
Plan established pursuant to

G.S. 135-5

( l ), and the Separate Insurance Benefits Plan for State and Local Governmental Law Enforcement Officers established pursuant to

G.S. 143-166.60

to determine what changes, if any, should be made to those Plans. The Commission shall consider what changes could be made to the Plans that would enhance the efficiency of and reduce the cost of the Plans to the State
and its employees.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.4, provides: “The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate cochairs of the Commission from among their respective appointees. The Commission shall meet upon the call
of the cochairs. Members of the Commission shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel allowance in accordance with

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate. The Commission, while in the discharge of official duties, may exercise all powers provided for under the provisions of

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19.1

through

G.S. 120-19

.4.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.5, provides: “The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Commission in its work. The House of Representatives’ and the Senate’s Directors of
Legislative Assistants shall assign clerical staff to the Commission, and the expenses relating to the clerical employees shall be borne by the Commission. Subject to the approval of the Legislative Services Commission, the Commission
may meet in the Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.6, provides: “The Commission shall employ an actuary with expertise in the areas of disability income insurance and group life insurance to assist the Commission in its work pursuant to the procedure set forth in

G.S. 120-32.02

. This actuary shall not be a State employee or a person currently under contract with the State to provide services. If necessary, the Commission may hire other employees as provided in

G.S. 120-32.02

.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.7, provides: “The Commission may meet during a regular or extra session of the General Assembly, subject to approval of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.8, provides: “The Commission shall submit a report of the results of its study, including any legislative recommendations, to the General Assembly not later than January 1, 2007.”

Session Laws 2006-248, s. 17.9, provides: “Of the funds appropriated to the General Assembly, the Legislative Services Commission shall allocate funds to implement the provisions of this Part.”

§ 135-101.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in this Article, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Base rate of compensation” shall mean the regular monthly rate of compensation not including pay for shift premiums, overtime, or other types of extraordinary pay; in all cases of doubt, the Board of Trustees shall determine what is “base rate of compensation”.

“Beneficiary” shall mean any person in receipt of a disability allowance or other benefit as provided in this Article.

“Benefits” shall mean the monthly disability income payments made pursuant to the provisions of this Article. In the event of death on or after the first day of a month, or in the event the short-term disability benefit ends on or after the first day
of a month where the beneficiary is eligible and applies for an early service or a service retirement allowance the first of the following month, the monthly benefit shall not be prorated and shall equal the benefits paid in the
previous month.

“Board of Trustees” shall mean the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System as provided in

G.S. 135-6

.

“Compensation” shall mean any compensation as the term is defined in G.S. 135-1(7a).

“Disability” or “Disabled” shall mean the mental or physical incapacity for the further performance of duty of a participant or beneficiary; provided that such incapacity was not the result of terrorist activity, active participation in a riot, committing
or attempting to commit a felony, or intentionally self-inflicted injury.

“Earnings” shall mean all income for personal services rendered or otherwise receivable, including, but not limited to, salaries and wages, fees, commissions, royalties, awards and other similar items and self-employment; in all cases of doubt, the Board
of Trustees shall determine what are “earnings”.

“Employee” shall mean any employee as the term is defined in

G.S. 135-1(10)

.

“Employer” shall mean any employer as the term is defined in

G.S. 135-1(11)

.

“Medical Board” shall mean the board of physicians as provided in

G.S. 135-102(d)

.

“Member” shall mean any member as the term is defined in

G.S. 135-1(13)

.

“Membership service” shall mean any service as defined in

G.S. 135-1(14)

.

“Participant” shall mean any teacher or employee eligible to participate in the Plan as provided in

G.S. 135-103

.

“Plan” shall mean the Disability Income Plan of North Carolina as provided in this Article.

“Retirement” shall mean the withdrawal from active service with a retirement allowance granted under the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter.

“Retirement System” shall mean the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System of North Carolina as defined in

G.S. 135-2

.

“Service” shall mean service as a teacher or employee as defined in

G.S. 135-1(10)

or

G.S. 135-1(25)

.

“State” shall mean the State of North Carolina.

“Teacher” shall mean any teacher as the term is defined in

G.S. 135-1(25)

.

“Trial Rehabilitation” shall mean a return to service in any capacity, if the return occurs within the waiting period as provided in

G.S. 135-104

; shall mean a return to service in the same capacity that existed prior to the disability if the return occurs within the short-term disability period as provided in

G.S. 135-105

; and shall mean a return to service in any capacity and in any position provided the salary earned is equal to or greater than the salary upon which the long-term disability benefit is based immediately preceding
the return to service, if the return occurs within the long-term disability period as provided in

G.S. 135-106

.

“Workers’ Compensation” shall mean any disability income benefits provided under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act, excluding any payments for a permanent partial disability rating.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 1989, c. 717, ss. 7, 8; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 779, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.30(s); 2003-284, s. 30.20(j); 2004-78, s. 1; 2006-74, ss. 1, 2.

§ 135-102.
Administration.

The provisions of this Article shall be administered by the Department of State Treasurer and the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System and all expenses in connection with the administration of the Plan, except for
expenses incurred by and properly charged to the employer, shall be charged against and paid from the trust fund as created and provided in this Article.

The Plan shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and under the name of Disability Income Plan of North Carolina shall all of its business be transacted, all of its funds invested and all of its cash, securities and other property be held.

The Department of State Treasurer and the Board of Trustees shall have the full power and authority to adopt rules for the administration of the Plan not inconsistent with the provisions of this Article. The Department of State Treasurer and the Board
of Trustees may appoint those agents, contractors, and employees as they deem advisable to carry out the terms and conditions of the Plan.

The Department of State Treasurer and the Board of Trustees shall designate a Medical Board to be composed of not fewer than three nor more than five physicians not eligible for benefits under the Plan. Other physicians, medical clinics, institutions
or agencies may be employed to conduct such medical examinations and tests necessary to provide the Medical Board with clinical evidence as may be needed to determine eligibility for benefits under the Plan. The Medical Board shall
investigate the results of medical examinations, clinical evidence, all essential statements and certifications by and on behalf of applicants for benefits and shall report in writing to the Board of Trustees the conclusions and
recommendations upon all matters referred to it.

The Department of State Treasurer and the Board of Trustees may provide the benefits according to the terms and conditions of the Plan as provided in this Article either by purchasing a contract or contracts with any insurance company licensed to do business
in this State or by establishing a separate trust fund qualified under Section 501(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q).

§ 135-103.
Eligible participants.

The eligible participants of the Disability Income Plan shall consist of:

All teachers and employees in service and members of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or participants of the Optional Retirement Program on January 1, 1988.

All persons who become teachers and employees or re-enter service as teachers or employees and are in service and members of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or participants of the Optional Retirement Program after January 1, 1988.

The participation of any person in the Disability Income Plan shall cease upon:

The termination of the participant’s employment as a teacher or State employee, or

The participant’s retirement under the provisions of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or the Optional Retirement Program, or

The participant’s becoming a beneficiary under the Plan, or

The participant’s death.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 2014-97, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-97, s. 8, effective July 1, 2014, inserted “State” in subdivision (b)(2).

§ 135-104.
Salary continuation.

A participant shall receive no benefits from the Plan for a period of 60 continuous calendar days from the onset of disability determined as the last actual day of service, the day of the disabling event if the disabling event occurred on a day other
than a normal workday, or the day succeeding at least 365 calendar days after service as a teacher or employee, whichever is later. These 60 continuous calendar days may be considered the waiting period before benefits are payable
from the Plan. During this waiting period, a participant may be paid such continuation of salary as provided by an employer through the use of sick leave, vacation leave or any other salary continuation. Any such continuation of
salary as provided by an employer shall not include any period a participant or beneficiary is in receipt of Workers’ Compensation benefits.

During the waiting period a participant may return to service for trial rehabilitation for periods of not greater than five continuous days of service. Such return to service will not cause a new waiting period to begin but shall extend the waiting period
by the number of days of service.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 1989, c. 717, s. 9; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 779, s. 2.

§ 135-105.
Short-term disability benefits.

Any participant who becomes disabled and is no longer able to perform his or her usual occupation may receive a benefit commencing on the first day succeeding the waiting period provided all of the following conditions are met:

Application for the benefit occurs at least 365 calendar days succeeding the participant’s date of initial employment as a teacher or employee.

The participant has at least one year of contributing membership service earned within 36 calendar months immediately preceding the date of disability. Salary continuation used during the period as provided in

G.S. 135-104

shall count toward this one-year requirement.

Application for the benefit occurs no later than 365 days following the first day of the waiting period.

The participant’s employer and attending physician certify that the participant is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty.

The participant’s incapacity was incurred at the time of active employment and has been continuous thereafter.As to the requirement that a participant applying for short term disability benefits have at least one year of contributing membership service
within the 36 calendar months immediately preceding the date of disability, a participant who would have qualified for a benefit under this section but for service in the uniformed services shall not be denied a benefit
under this section because of that interruption for military service provided all other requirements of this section are met.Notwithstanding the requirement that the incapacity was incurred at the time of active employment,
any participant who becomes disabled while on an employer approved leave of absence and who is eligible for and in receipt of temporary total benefits under The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act, Article 1 of Chapter
97 of the General Statutes, will be eligible for all benefits provided under this Article.

The benefits as provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall commence on the first day following the waiting period and shall be payable for a period of 365 days as long as the participant continues to meet the definition of disability. However,
a disabled participant may elect to receive any salary continuation as provided in

G.S. 135-104

in lieu of short-term disability benefits; provided further, such election shall not extend the 365 days duration of short-term payments. An election to receive any salary continuation for any part of a given day
shall be in lieu of any short-term benefit otherwise payable for that day, provided further, any lump-sum payout for vacation leave shall be treated as if the beneficiary or participant had exhausted the leave and shall be in lieu
of any short-term benefit otherwise payable.

The monthly benefit as provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be equal to fifty percent (50%) of 1/12th of the annual base rate of compensation last payable to the participant prior to the beginning of the short-term benefit period as may be
adjusted for percentage increases as provided under

G.S. 135-108

plus fifty percent (50%) of 1/12th of the annual longevity payment to which the participant would be eligible, to a maximum of three thousand dollars ($3,000) per month reduced by monthly payments for Workers’ Compensation
to which the participant may be entitled. The monthly benefit shall be further reduced by the amount of any payments from the federal Veterans Administration, any other federal agency, or any payments made under the provisions
of

G.S. 127A-108

, to which the participant or beneficiary may be entitled on account of the same disability. Provided, that should a participant have earnings in an amount greater than the short-term benefit, the amount of the short-term
benefit shall be reduced on a dollar-for-dollar basis by the amount that exceeds the short-term benefit.

For short-term disability benefits that begin before July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section shall be administered by the employer and further, the benefits during the first six months of the short-term disability period shall be the full responsibility
of and paid by the employer; Provided, further, that upon the completion of the initial six months of the short-term disability period, the employer will continue to be responsible for the short-term benefits to the participant,
however, such employer shall notify the Plan, at the conclusion of the short-term disability period or upon termination of short-term disability benefits, if earlier, of the amount of short-term benefits and State Health Insurance
premiums paid by the employer and the Plan shall reimburse the employer the amounts so paid.

(d1)
For short-term disability benefits that begin on and after July 1, 2019, the provisions of this section shall be administered by the employer. The benefits during the first 12 months of the short-term disability
period, including benefits from a preliminary determination of eligibility for long-term disability under subsection (f) of this section, shall be the full responsibility of and paid by the employer.

During the short-term disability period, a beneficiary may return to service for trial rehabilitation for periods of not greater than 40 continuous days of service. Such return will not cause the beneficiary to become a participant and will not require
a new waiting period or short-term disability period to commence unless a different incapacity occurs. The period of rehabilitative employment shall not extend the period of the short-term disability benefits.

A participant or beneficiary of short-term disability benefits or his legal representative or any person deemed by the Board of Trustees to represent the participant or beneficiary, or the employer of the participant or beneficiary, may request the Board
of Trustees to have the Medical Board make a determination of eligibility for the short-term disability benefits as provided in this section or to make a preliminary determination of eligibility for the long-term disability benefits
as provided in

G.S. 135-106

. A preliminary determination of eligibility for long-term disability benefits shall not preclude the requirement that the Medical Board make a determination of eligibility for long-term disability benefits.

The Board of Trustees may extend the short-term disability benefits of a beneficiary beyond the benefit period of 365 days for an additional period of not more than 365 days; provided the Medical Board determines that the beneficiary’s disability is temporary
and likely to end within the extended period of short-term disability benefits. During the extended period of short-term disability benefits, payment of benefits shall be made by the Plan directly to the beneficiary. This extended
period of short-term disability benefits shall be treated in the same manner as long-term disability payments for the purposes of

G.S. 135-108

.

History.
1987, c. 738, s. 29(q); 1989, c. 717, s. 10; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1032, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 779, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.30(t); 2003-284, s. 30.20(k); 2004-78, s. 2; 2007-325, s.
1; 2013-288, s. 6; 2018-52, s. 10(a); 2018-85, s. 1.